Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 41.1. Industrial Hemp.
§ 3.2-4116.
Registration conditions.

A person who is not a federally licensed hemp producer shall obtain a registration pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

prior to growing, dealing in, or processing any industrial hemp in the Commonwealth.

A person issued a registration pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

shall:

Maintain records that reflect compliance with this chapter;

Retain all industrial hemp growing, dealing, or processing records for at least three years;

Allow his production field, dealership, or process site to be inspected by and at the discretion of the Commissioner or his designee, the Department of State Police, or the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality in which the production field or dealership or process site exists;

Allow the Commissioner or his designee to monitor and test the grower’s, dealer’s, or processor’s industrial hemp for compliance with tetrahydrocannabinol levels and for other appropriate purposes established pursuant to §

3.2-4114

, at the cost of the grower, dealer, or processor; and

If required by the Commissioner, destroy, at the cost of the grower, dealer, or processor and in a manner approved of and verified by the Commissioner, any Cannabis sativa that the grower grows, the dealer deals in, or the processor processes that has been tested and, following any re-sampling and retesting as authorized pursuant to the provisions of §

3.2-4114.2

, is found to have a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than that allowed by federal law, or any Cannabis sativa product that the processor produces.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and in subsection B, deleted subdivisions 6 and 7, pertaining to participants in the higher education industrial hemp research program and the Virginia industrial hemp research program, respectively; in subsection A and subdivision B 1, inserted “dealing in” following “growing”; in subdivision B 1, inserted “or federal”; in subdivision B 2, inserted “dealing”; in subdivision B 3, inserted “dealership” and “or dealership”; in subdivision B 4, inserted “dealer’s” and “dealer”; in subdivision B 5, inserted “dealer,” “the dealer deals in,” “following any re-sampling and retesting as authorized pursuant to the provisions of §

3.2-4114.2

” and “or any Cannabis sativa product that the processor produces” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, inserted “who is not a federally licensed hemp producer” in subsection A and deleted “and with all other state or federal laws regulating the growing, dealing in, or processing of industrial hemp” at the end of subdivision B 1.

§ 3.2-4117.
Repealed by Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 2, effective March 21, 2019.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-4117

, pertaining to additional industrial hemp registration, derived from 2015, cc. 158, 180; 2016, cc. 61, 170; 2018, cc. 689, 690.

§ 3.2-4118.
Forfeiture of industrial hemp grower, dealer, or processor registration; violations.

The Commissioner shall deny the application, or suspend or revoke the registration, of any person who, with a culpable mental state greater than negligence, violates any provision of this chapter. The Commissioner shall provide reasonable notice of an informal fact-finding conference pursuant to §

2.2-4019

to any person in connection with the denial, suspension, or revocation of a registration.

If a registration is revoked as the result of an informal hearing, the decision may be appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). The grower, dealer, or processor may appeal a final order to the circuit court in accordance with the Administrative Process Act.

A person issued a registration pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

who negligently (i) fails to provide a description and geographic data sufficient for locating his production field, dealership, or process site; (ii) grows, deals in, or processes Cannabis sativa with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration greater than that allowed by federal law; or (iii) produces a Cannabis sativa product shall comply with any corrective action plan established by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of subsection E. The Commissioner shall not deem a grower negligent if such grower makes reasonable efforts to grow industrial hemp and grows Cannabis sativa with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not exceed the total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration percentage established in federal regulations applicable to negligent violations located at 7 C.F.R. 990.6(b)(3).

A person who grows, deals in, or processes industrial hemp and who negligently fails to register pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

shall comply with any corrective action plan established by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of subsection E.

A corrective action plan established by the Commissioner in response to a negligent violation of a provision of this chapter shall identify a reasonable date by which the person who is the subject of the plan shall correct the negligent violation and shall require such person to report periodically for not less than two calendar years to the Commissioner on the person’s compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

No person who negligently violates the provisions of this chapter three times in a five-year period shall be eligible to grow, deal in, or process industrial hemp for a period of five years beginning on the date of the third violation.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and in subsection A, inserted “with a culpable mental state greater than negligence”; in subsection B, inserted “dealer”; rewrote subsection C, which read: “The Commissioner may revoke any registration of any grower or processor who has pled guilty to, or been convicted of, a felony”; added subsections D through F; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, added the last sentence in subsection C.

§ 3.2-4119.
Eligibility to receive tobacco settlement funds.

Industrial hemp growers, dealers, or processors registered under this chapter or federally licensed hemp producers may be eligible to receive funds from the Tobacco Indemnification and Community Revitalization Fund established pursuant to §

3.2-3106

.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and substituted “growers or processors registered” for “growers licensed.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and inserted “dealers.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, inserted “or federally licensed hemp producers.”

§ 3.2-4120.
Repealed by Acts 2018, cc. 689 and 690, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-4120

, which created the Industrial hemp research program, derived from Acts 2015, cc. 158, 180.

§ 3.2-4121.
Virginia Industrial Hemp Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Industrial Hemp Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys levied and collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the Department solely for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2020, cc. 659, 660.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, in consultation with the Secretary of Administration, shall by November 1, 2020, report to the Governor and the General Assembly a plan for the long-term sustainability of funding for the industrial hemp program, including consideration of the cost of testing the tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of hemp crops grown in Virginia as required by state or federal law.”

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall, by November 1, 2020, report to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources regarding recommended legislative or regulatory amendments necessary to (i) allow a registered industrial hemp grower to grow industrial hemp with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than one percent and (ii) authorize the Department to modify its existing industrial hemp program as quickly and efficiently as possible to respond to any final regulation adopted by the U.S. Department of Agriculture regarding the domestic production of hemp.”

Acts 2020, cc. 659 and 660, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services from adopting a tiered approach to testing of tetrahydrocannabinol concentrations at the processor level if such approach is not prohibited by federal law or by any rule or regulation of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.”

Effective date.

Acts 2020, cc. 659, 660, became effective April 6, 2020, by emergency clause.